Utah statutes.
10-2-406.   Notice of certification -- Publishing and providing notice of
petition.
(1)  After receipt of the notice of certification from the city recorder or
town clerk under Subsection 10-2-405(2)(c)(i), the municipal legislative body
shall:
(a) (i)  publish a notice:
(A)  at least once a week for three successive weeks, beginning no later than
ten days after receipt of the notice of certification, in a newspaper of
general circulation within:
(I)  the area proposed for annexation; and
(II)  the unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area proposed for
annexation; and
(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101, for three weeks, beginning no later
than ten days after receipt of the notice of certification; and
(ii)  in accordance with Subsection (1)(a)(i)(A), if there is no newspaper of
general circulation within those areas, post written notices in conspicuous
places within those areas that are most likely to give notice to residents
within those areas; and
(b)  within 20 days of receipt of the notice of certification under Subsection
10-2-405(2)(c)(i), mail written notice to each affected entity.
(2) (a)  The notice under Subsections (1)(a) and (b) shall:
(i)  state that a petition has been filed with the municipality proposing the
annexation of an area to the municipality;
(ii)  state the date of the municipal legislative body's receipt of the notice
of certification under Subsection 10-2-405(2)(c)(i);
(iii)  describe the area proposed for annexation in the annexation petition;
(iv)  state that the complete annexation petition is available for inspection
and copying at the office of the city recorder or town clerk;
(v)  state in conspicuous and plain terms that the municipality may grant the
petition and annex the area described in the petition unless, within the time
required under Subsection 10-2-407(2)(a)(i)(A), a written protest to the
annexation petition is filed with the commission and a copy of the protest
delivered to the city recorder or town clerk of the proposed annexing
municipality;
(vi)  state the address of the commission or, if a commission has not yet been
created in the county, the county clerk, where a protest to the annexation
petition may be filed;
(vii)  state that the area proposed for annexation to the municipality will
also automatically be annexed to a local district providing fire protection,
paramedic, and emergency services or a local district providing law
enforcement service, as the case may be, as provided in Section 17B-1-416, if:
(A)  the proposed annexing municipality is entirely within the boundaries of a
local district:
(I)  that provides fire protection, paramedic, and emergency services or law
enforcement service, respectively; and
(II)  in the creation of which an election was not required because of
Subsection 17B-1-214(3)(c); and
(B)  the area proposed to be annexed to the municipality is not already within
the boundaries of the local district; and
(viii)  state that the area proposed for annexation to the municipality will
be automatically withdrawn from a local district providing fire protection,
paramedic, and emergency services or a local district providing law
enforcement service, as the case may be, as provided in Subsection
17B-1-502(2), if:
(A)  the petition proposes the annexation of an area that is within the
boundaries of a local district:
(I)  that provides fire protection, paramedic, and emergency services or law
enforcement service, respectively; and
(II)  in the creation of which an election was not required because of
Subsection 17B-1-214(3)(c); and
(B)  the proposed annexing municipality is not within the boundaries of the
local district.
(b)  The statement required by Subsection (2)(a)(v) shall state the deadline
for filing a written protest in terms of the actual date rather than by
reference to the statutory citation.
(c)  In addition to the requirements under Subsection (2)(a), a notice under
Subsection (1)(a) for a proposed annexation of an area within a county of the
first class shall include a statement that a protest to the annexation
petition may be filed with the commission by property owners if it contains
the signatures of the owners of private real property that:
(i)  is located in the unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area
proposed for annexation;
(ii)  covers at least 25% of the private land area located in the
unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area proposed for annexation; and
(iii)  is equal in value to at least 15% of all real property located in the
unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area proposed for annexation.
